Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Article 9. Mississippi Business Finance Corporation Beginning Farmer Program.

§ 57-10-301.
Short title.

This article shall be entitled the “Mississippi Business Finance Corporation Beginning Farmer Program.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 461, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1992).

§ 57-10-303.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Act” means the Mississippi Business Financing Act being Title 57, Chapter 10, Article 7, Mississippi Code of 1972.

“Agricultural land” means land suitable for use in farming.

“Agricultural improvements” means any improvements, buildings, structures or fixtures suitable for use in farming which are located on agricultural land. “Agricultural improvements” includes a single-family dwelling located on agricultural land which is or will be occupied by the beginning farmer and structures attached to or incidental to the use of the dwelling.

“Corporation” means the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation.

“Beginning farmer” means an individual or partnership with a low or moderate net worth that engages in farming or wishes to engage in farming.

“Bonds” means bonds issued by the corporation pursuant to the provisions of the Mississippi Business Financing Act.

“Depreciable agricultural property” means personal property suitable for use in farming for which an income tax deduction for depreciation is allowable in computing federal income tax under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

“Farming” means the cultivation of land for the production of agricultural crops, the raising of poultry, the production of eggs, the production of milk, the production of fruit or other horticultural crops, grazing, the production of livestock, aquaculture, hydroponics, the production of forest products or other activities designated by the corporation.

“Mortgage” means a mortgage, mortgage deed, deed of trust, or other instrument creating a first lien, subject only to title exceptions and encumbrances acceptable to the corporation, including any other mortgage liens of equal standing with or subordinate to the mortgage loan retained by a seller or conveyed to a mortgage lender, on a fee interest in agricultural land and agricultural improvements.

“Mortgage lender” means a bank, trust company, mortgage company, national banking association, savings and loan association, life insurance company, any state or federal governmental agency or instrumentality, including without limitation the Federal Land Bank or any of its local associations, or any other financial institution or entity authorized to make mortgage loans or secured loans in this state.

“Mortgage loan” means a financial obligation secured by a mortgage.

“Note” means a bond anticipation note or other obligation or evidence of indebtedness issued by the corporation pursuant to this article.

“Secured loan” means a financial obligation secured by a chattel mortgage, security agreement or other instrument creating a lien on an interest in depreciable agricultural property.

“State agency” means any board, commission, department, public officer or other agency or authority of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 461, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 548, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1993).

§ 57-10-305.
Legislative findings and determinations.

The Legislature finds and determines as follows:

There exists a serious problem in the state regarding the ability of nonestablished farmers to acquire agricultural land and agricultural improvements and depreciable agricultural property in order to enter farming.

This barrier to entry into farming is conducive to consolidation of acreage of agricultural land with fewer individuals resulting in a grave threat to the traditional family farm.

These conditions result in a loss in population, unemployment and a movement of persons from rural communities to urban areas accompanied by added costs to communities for creation of new public facilities and services.

One major cause of this condition has been recurrent shortages of funds in private channels and the high interest cost of borrowing.

These shortages and costs have made the sale and purchase of agricultural land to beginning farmers a virtual impossibility in many parts of the state.

The ordinary operations of private enterprise have not in the past corrected these conditions.

A stable supply of adequate funds for agricultural financing is required to encourage beginning farmers in an orderly and sustained manner and to reduce the problems described in this section.

It is necessary that the corporation be given the authority to encourage ownership of farms by beginning farmers by providing purchase money loans to beginning farmers who are not able to obtain adequate capital elsewhere to provide such funds and to lower costs through the use of public financing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 461, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1992).

§ 57-10-307.
Development of program; general powers of corporation; rules and regulations.

The corporation shall develop a beginning farmer loan program to facilitate the acquisition of agricultural land and improvements and depreciable agricultural property by beginning farmers. The corporation shall exercise the powers granted to it in Title 57, Chapter 10, Article 9 and Title 57, Chapter 10, Article 7, Mississippi Code of 1972, in order to fulfill the goal of providing financial assistance to beginning farmers in the acquisition of agricultural land and agricultural improvements and depreciable agricultural property. The corporation may participate in and cooperate with programs of the Farmers Home Administration, Federal Land Bank or any other agency or instrumentality of the federal government or with any program of any other state agency in the administration of the beginning farmer loan program and in the making or purchasing of mortgage or secured loans pursuant to this article.

The corporation may participate in any federal programs designed to assist beginning farmers or in any related federal or state programs.

Prior to carrying out the powers granted under Sections 57-10-301 through 57-10-305, the corporation shall promulgate rules and regulations governing activities authorized hereunder, including but not limited to rules and regulations including the following:

The beginning farmer is a resident of the state. If the beginning farmer is a partnership, all partners shall be residents of the state.

The agricultural land and agricultural improvements or depreciable agricultural property the beginning farmer proposes to purchase will be located in the state.

The beginning farmer has sufficient education, training or experience in the type of farming for which the beginning farmer requests the mortgage or secured loan. If the beginning farmer is a partnership, all partners shall have sufficient education, training or experience in the type of farming for which the beginning farmer requests the mortgage or secured loan.

A loan to a beginning farmer for the acquisition of agricultural land and agricultural improvements does not exceed Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00). A loan to a beginning farmer for the acquisition of depreciable agricultural property does not exceed One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($125,000.00).

If the loan is for the acquisition of agricultural land, the beginning farmer has or will have access to adequate working capital, farm equipment, machinery or livestock. If the loan is for the acquisition of depreciable agricultural property, the beginning farmer has or will have access to adequate working capital or agricultural land.

The beginning farmer will materially and substantially participate in farming. If the beginning farmer is a partnership, each partner shall materially and substantially participate in farming.

If the beginning farmer is an individual, the agricultural land and agricultural improvements shall only be used for farming by the individual, the individual’s spouse, the individual’s minor children, or any of them. If the beginning farmer is a partnership, the agricultural land and agricultural improvements shall only be used for farming by the partners, each partner’s spouse, each partner’s minor children, or any of them.

The beginning farmer has not previously received financing under this article for the acquisition of property similar in nature to the property for which the loan is sought. However, this restriction shall not apply if the amount previously received plus the amount of the loan does not exceed Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) in the case of agricultural land and improvements or One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($125,000.00) in the case of depreciable agricultural property.

The corporation may provide in a mortgage or secured loan made or purchased pursuant to this article that the loan may not be assumed or any interest in the agricultural land or improvements or depreciable agricultural property may not be leased, sold or otherwise conveyed without its prior written consent and may provide a due-on-sale clause with respect to the occurrence of any of the foregoing events without its prior written consent. The corporation may provide by rule the grounds for permitted assumptions of a mortgage or for the leasing, sale or other conveyance of any interest in the agricultural land or improvements. However, the corporation shall provide and state in a mortgage or secured loan that the corporation has the power to raise the interest rate of the loan to the prevailing market rate if the mortgage or secured loan is assumed by a farmer who is already established in that field at the time of the assumption of the loan.

The corporation may participate in any interest in any mortgage or secured loan made or purchased pursuant to this article with a mortgage lender. The participation interest may be on a parity with the interest in the mortgage or secured loan retained by the corporation, equally and ratably secured by the mortgage or securing agreement securing the mortgage or secured loan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 461, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1992).

§ 57-10-309.
Mortgage or secured loans; issuance of bonds or notes.

The corporation may make mortgage or secured loans, including, but not limited to, mortgage or secured loans insured, guaranteed or otherwise secured by the federal government or a federal governmental agency or instrumentality, a state agency or private mortgage insurers, to beginning farmers to provide financing for agricultural land and agricultural improvements or depreciable agricultural property.

Mortgage or secured loans shall contain terms and provisions, including interest rates, and be in a form established by rules of the corporation. The corporation may require the beginning farmer to execute a note, loan agreement or other evidence of indebtedness and furnish additional assurances and guarantees, including insurance, reasonably related to protecting the security of the mortgage or secured loan, as the corporation deems necessary.

The corporation may enter into a loan agreement with a beginning farmer to finance in whole or in part the acquisition by construction or purchase of agricultural land, agricultural improvements or depreciable agricultural property. The repayment obligation of the beginning farmer may be unsecured, or may be secured by a mortgage or security agreement or by other security as the corporation deems advisable, and may be evidenced by one or more notes of the beginning farmer. The loan agreement may contain terms and conditions as the corporation deems advisable.

The corporation may issue its bonds and notes for the purposes set forth in this article and Title 57, Chapter 10, Article 7, Mississippi Code of 1972, relating to the issuance of bonds and notes by the corporation and may enter into a lending agreement or purchase agreement with one or more bondholders or noteholders containing the terms and conditions of the repayment of and the security for the bonds or notes. Bonds and notes must be authorized by a resolution of the corporation. The corporation and the bondholders or noteholders may enter into an agreement to provide for any of the following:

That the proceeds of the bonds and notes and investments thereon may be received, held and disbursed by the bondholders or noteholders, or by a trustee or agent designated by the corporation.

That the bondholders or noteholders or a trustee or agent designated by the corporation may collect, invest and apply the amounts payable under the loan agreement or any other security instrument securing the debt obligation of the beginning farmer.

That the bondholders or noteholders may enforce the remedies provided in the loan agreement or security instrument on their own behalf without the appointment or designation of a trustee and if there is a default in the principal of or interest on the bonds or notes or in the performance of any agreement contained therein, the payment or performance may be enforced in accordance with the provisions contained therein.

That if there is a default in the payment of the principal or interest on a mortgage or security instrument or a violation of an agreement contained in the mortgage or security instrument, the mortgage or security instrument may be foreclosed or enforced and any collateral sold under proceedings or actions permitted by law and a trustee under the mortgage or security agreement or the holder of any bonds or notes secured thereby may become a purchaser if it is the highest bidder.

Other terms and conditions.

The corporation shall provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or notes that the principal and interest shall be limited obligations payable solely out of the revenues derived from the debt obligation, collateral or other security furnished by or on behalf of the beginning farmer, and that the principal and interest does not constitute an indebtedness of the corporation, the state or any political subdivision thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 461, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1992).